Massachusetts, session 194th, H4621.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the executive
body of the town of Boylston, previously known as the board of selectmen, shall be known as the
select board and shall have the powers and authority of a board of selectmen under any general
or special law. The members of the select board, previously known as selectmen, shall be known
as select board members and the chair of the select board, previously known as the chairman,
shall be known as the chair.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding sections 21 and 32 of chapter 40 of the General Laws,
section 5 of chapter 40A of the General Laws or any general or special law to the contrary, the
select board of the town of Boylston may amend the general by-laws and zoning by-laws of the
town by majority vote to revise all references to the board of selectmen, its members and its
chairman to select board, select board members and chair of the select board, respectively, in
accordance with this act.
of 2

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2